Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-712
President and Vice President; candidates; certification of names and addresses; time; Secretary of State; place names on ballot.

Not later than September 8 prior to any general election at which candidates for President and Vice President of the United States are to be voted upon by the registered voters of the state, the appropriate officers of the various national political party conventions shall certify the names and addresses of such candidates selected by convention to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall then take appropriate steps to place the names of the presidential and vice-presidential candidates on the ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 212;

Laws 2008, LB857, § 1.

Although Nebraska's statutes unconstitutionally deny an independent candidate access to appear on the ballot in presidential elections, the court directed the independent be included upon a determination he was a serious candidate, truly independent, with a satisfactory level of community support. McCarthy v. Exon, 424 F.Supp. 1143 (D. Neb. 1976).